Washington statutes.
RCW 43.22.495

Manufactured housing—Duties.

Beginning on July 1, 2007, the department of labor and industries shall perform all the consumer complaint and related functions of the state administrative agency that are required for purposes of complying with the regulations established by the federal department of housing and urban development for manufactured housing, including the preparation and submission of the state administrative plan.

The department of labor and industries may enter into state or local interagency agreements to coordinate site inspection activities with record monitoring and complaint handling. The interagency agreement may also provide for the reimbursement for cost of work that an agency performs. The department may include other related areas in any interagency agreements which are necessary for the efficient provision of services.

[ 2023 c 36 s 9; 2007 c 432 s 7; 1995 c 399 s 69; 1990 c 176 s 1.]